Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2501
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-2501 to 79-2510 shall be known and may be cited as the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Program Act.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 15.